California statutes. Education Code
(e) The partner district may offer any programs or courses for which it has secured applicable approvals. In addition, any programs and courses that were previously approved by the board of governors to be offered by the Compton Community College District may continue to be offered by the partner district in the territory of the Compton Community College District without additional state approval until June 30, 2011.

(f) No later than 30 days after Compton Community College’s loss of accreditation, the board of governors shall approve the facilities of Compton Community College as an off-campus educational center of the partner district. The center shall be known as the Compton Community Educational Center. The board of governors shall give notice of its approval to the county committee and county superintendent having jurisdiction over any territory affected by the action.

(g) The board of governors may permanently or temporarily waive any of its regulatory requirements necessary to effectuate this article, including, but not necessarily limited to, its regulations regarding educational centers.

(h) The partner district is eligible to provide instruction at the center without the recommendation of the California Postsecondary Education Commission under Section 66904 until the district secures the commission’s recommendation for the facility to operate as an off-campus educational center or until June 30, 2011, whichever occurs first.

(i) The partner district shall comply with all federal requirements to ensure that students taking classes offered by the partner district at the Compton Community Educational Center remain eligible for federal financial assistance.

(j) Students enrolled in the Compton Community College District as of January 31, 2006, shall be subject to the following conditions:

(1) The partner district shall ensure that any student who, by the end of the Spring 2006 term, has completed at least 75 percent of the courses required for the degree or certificate he or she is pursuing will be able to complete that program. Every reasonable effort shall be made to allow other students who have begun work toward a certificate or degree, but who have not completed 75 percent of the required coursework, to continue and complete their programs.

(2) Students enrolling in classes provided by the partner district pursuant to this section shall be considered students of the partner district, shall receive credit from the partner district for classes they successfully complete, shall receive certificates or degrees they earn from the partner district, and shall receive financial aid through the partner district if they meet all applicable eligibility requirements.

(3) The partner district shall maintain student records related to the attendance of students in classes it offers pursuant to this section in accordance with all applicable state and federal laws.

(4) The partner district shall consider each student who enrolls for classes no later than the Spring 2007 term to be a continuing student for purposes of enrollment priorities.

(5) Any regulations of the board of governors relating to minimum residence at the college granting a degree shall not be applicable.

(k) The board of governors shall adopt any regulations necessary to implement this article. These regulations may be adopted as emergency regulations that may remain in effect for up to one year from the date of adoption, and shall not be subject to paragraph (5) or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 70901.5 or to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(l) (1) The partner district shall provide the services described in this article for a minimum of five years from the date those services commence pursuant to subdivision (d), and shall thereafter provide the services for any additional period determined necessary by the board of governors. In addition, the board of governors may require, in its sole discretion, that the services described herein be modified or terminated at an earlier date based on the best interests of the California Community Colleges system and its students.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), either the partner district or the special trustee appointed pursuant to Section 71093 may initiate termination of the agreements described in subdivision (d) by giving 180 days’ written notice to the other party and to the board of governors. No termination pursuant to this subdivision may take effect until the end of the semester following the notice provided under this paragraph, so as to protect students from a mid-term interruption of educational services. Should the partner district provide notice of a desire to terminate any agreements at a time when the trustee determines that services provided under those agreements are still necessary to serve the interests of Compton students and residents or at a time when the Compton Community College District is not fully accredited and bonds issued pursuant to Section 41329.52 are outstanding, the partner district shall continue the services until it can secure a district to provide uninterrupted comparable services to the satisfaction of the special trustee.

(m) (1) The Compton Community College District shall continue to be responsible for ensuring that all of its permanent records are retained and stored as required by state law and that all records related to its administration of programs under Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act are retained for a minimum of three years after the conclusion of its participation in those programs.

(2) The Compton Community College District shall be responsible for institutional actions related to the loss of accreditation, including actions that are required under Section 688.26 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, related to the ending of the participation of the Compton Community College District in programs under Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act, refunding any students’ unearned tuition and fees, refunding to the federal government any unexpended federal student financial aid funds, returning to lenders any loan proceeds not distributed to students, or the collection of outstanding student debts to the Compton Community College District.

(n) In addition to addressing the ongoing educational needs of the students of the Compton Community College District, the partner district and the special trustee appointed pursuant to Section 71093 shall take steps aimed at achieving the goal of seeking renewed accreditation for Compton Community College at the earliest feasible date. Progress toward achieving this goal shall be periodically reported to the board of governors.

(o) No person, firm or organization shall, without the permission of the Compton Community College District, use the name “Compton Community College,” or any name of which these words are a part, or any abbreviation thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 50, Sec. 11.   Effective June 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

74292.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, so long as any bond issued pursuant to Section 63049.67 of the Government Code for the Compton Community College District is outstanding, all real property leases securing those bonds shall be leased by the Compton Community College District, and not the Compton Community Educational Center or any partner district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 50, Sec. 11.   Effective June 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

74292.7.

Cal Grant awards to students of the Compton Community College District shall not be adversely affected by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 50, Sec. 11.   Effective June 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

74293.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(a) The partner district shall provide educational programs, as described in Section 74292, at the Compton Community Educational Center on the following terms:

(1) To the extent determined necessary by agreement between the Compton Community College District and the partner district, the Compton Community College District shall assign its current employees, or reemploy former employees, to provide educational or support services to students under the instructional services or other agreements described in Section 74292. The Compton Community College District has no obligation to assign or to reemploy persons who occupy or previously occupied administrative or supervisory positions to those positions. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who provides services pursuant to this paragraph shall not be deemed to be an employee of the partner district or gain any status with the partner district for any purpose.

(2) Individuals providing educational or support services pursuant to paragraph (1) who serve as academic employees or educational administrators shall meet applicable minimum qualifications established by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges as well as any other job-related qualifications for service that are established by the partner district.

(3) The partner district shall have the primary right to direct activities under the contract or contracts in a manner that is consistent with the role of Compton Community College District as the employer of the individuals who are assigned duties under the agreements by the partner district. The partner district shall provide performance assessments to the special trustee appointed pursuant to Section 71093 regarding the services provided by employees of the Compton Community College District.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the ability of the Compton Community College District to employ employees of any type or class as otherwise authorized by law as needed to provide necessary services.

(c) The Compton Community College District shall continue to be responsible for all retiree benefits that it offered its employees prior to the date of its loss of accreditation and for retirement and other benefits for its employees assigned to provide services pursuant to subdivision (a). The partner district shall have no responsibility for any retiree or other benefits for persons provided by the Compton Community College District to serve under instructional services or other agreements described in this article.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the ability of the partner district to assign its existing personnel to oversee or manage services provided under instructional services or other agreements described in Section 74292 or to employ employees of any type or class as otherwise authorized by law as needed to provide oversight and management of those services. Any person who provides services pursuant to this subdivision shall not be deemed to be an employee of the Compton Community College District or gain any status with that district for any purpose, and that person shall not lose any rights, benefits, or status that he or she had previously acquired with the partner district.

(e) Nothing in this article shall be construed to interfere with, or require any change in, the existing bargaining units and collective bargaining agreements of the Compton Community College District.

(f) All existing statutory due process protections for employees of the Compton Community College District shall remain in effect including, but not necessarily limited to, the provisions governing layoff or dismissal, acquisition of tenure, and all other provisions of the Education Code except as expressly provided in this article.

(g) Nothing in this article shall be construed to interfere with or preclude negotiations with employee organizations in either of the districts over the effects, if any, of the partner district’s operation of the Compton Community College District.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 50, Sec. 11.   Effective June 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

74295.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(a) The Compton Community College District shall receive apportionment for courses provided at the Compton Community Educational Center by the partner district pursuant to Section 74292, subject to the transfer of moneys described in Sections 41329.53 and 41329.55 and in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) For the 2005–06 fiscal year, an amount not less than the amount that was received by the Compton Community College District for the attendance of full-time equivalent students for the 2004–05 fiscal year.

(2) For the 2006–07 fiscal year, an amount not less than 90 percent of the amount that was received by the Compton Community College District for the attendance of full-time equivalent students for the 2004–05 fiscal year.

(3) For the 2007–08 fiscal year, an amount not less than 80 percent of the amount that was received by the Compton Community College District for the attendance of full-time equivalent students for the 2004–05 fiscal year.

(4) For the 2008–09 fiscal year, an amount not less than 70 percent of the amount that was received by the Compton Community College District for the attendance of full-time equivalent students for the 2004–05 fiscal year.

(b) In allocating funds for categorical aid to the Compton Community College District, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall treat the Compton Community Educational Center as a separate college.

(c) The Compton Community College District shall not be subject to Section 84362 for the 2003–04 fiscal year to the 2008–09 fiscal year, inclusive.

(d) Should the loss of accreditation by the Compton Community College result in a lapse of federal financial assistance to otherwise eligible students before their eligibility is recognized through the partner district, the Compton Community College District may use a portion of the proceeds from the loan described in Section 41329.58 to provide comparable amounts of assistance to eligible students. This replacement funding shall not extend beyond the end of the term during which the lapse of federal funding occurred.

(e) The provisions of subdivision (a) shall be used solely to determine the apportionment funding to be allocated to the Compton Community College District. In computing statewide entitlements to funding based upon the attendance of full-time equivalent students, neither the Compton Community College District nor its partner district shall be credited with more full-time equivalent students for the Compton Community College District than were actually enrolled in attendance. It is the intent of the Legislature that any amounts necessary to make the apportionments required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be drawn from the total statewide funding available for community college apportionments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 50, Sec. 11.   Effective June 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

74295.5.

Notwithstanding any other law:

 (a) All of the following shall be applicable to a student who is enrolled at El Camino College Compton Center six months before the change in control of that institution from the El Camino Community College District to the Compton Community College District:

(1) The Compton Community College District shall ensure that any student of El Camino College Compton Center who, by the end of the spring term immediately preceding the change in control of the institution, has completed at least 75 percent of the courses required for the degree or certificate that he or she is pursuing shall be able to complete that program at Compton College. The Compton Community College District shall make every reasonable effort to allow other students who have begun work toward a certificate or degree, but who have not completed 75 percent of the required coursework, to continue and complete their programs at Compton College.

(2) The Compton Community College District shall consider each student of El Camino College Compton Center who enrolls for classes at Compton College to be a continuing student for purposes of enrollment priorities.

(3) Regulations of the board of governors relating to minimum residence at a community college granting a degree shall not be applicable to these students.

(b) For academic years 2018–19 to 2021–22, inclusive, the Compton Community College District shall be exempt from subdivision (d) of Section 84362.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 757, Sec. 1.   (AB 1299)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

74296.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(a) In any action in which a court finds that any provision of this article is unlawful, or in any action challenging the implementation of this article, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, the partner district, the Compton Community College District, and their respective officers, employees, and agents, are immune from the imposition of any award of money damages, including the award of attorney’s fees, except to the extent that any liability for those claims arises from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the party claiming the immunity.

(b) The state shall, from funds specifically appropriated for that purpose, indemnify and defend the partner district from and against any claims, other than claims based upon gross negligence or willful misconduct, arising out of its participation in the activities specified in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 50, Sec. 11.   Effective June 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 46.3. The Common Cloud Data Platform [74500. - 74505.]

74500.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Common Cloud Data Platform.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 13.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

74501.

For purposes of this part, both of the following definitions apply:

(a) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(b) “Real time” means real-time data or near real-time data.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 13.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

74502.

The chancellor’s office shall establish the Common Cloud Data Platform to create a unified, modern data infrastructure to enhance statewide reporting, data sharing, and available analytical tools across participating community college districts and the chancellor’s office. The Common Cloud Data Platform shall be designed to support community college student success initiatives, improve community college districts’ stewardship of resources and ability to use data-driven decisionmaking, and streamline community college administrative processes, in alignment with the vision and priorities adopted by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 13.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

74503.

The Common Cloud Data Platform shall be designed to enable, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) Role-appropriate access to real-time data for chancellor’s office staff, community college district staff, faculty, students, and administrators that supports data-driven decisionmaking. This access may include community college district-level and chancellor’s office-level dashboards that enhance the analytics capabilities of community college districts and the chancellor’s office.

(b) The integration and centralization of data from various enterprise resource planning and technology systems into a modern, cloud-based system.

(c) The facilitation of data from existing and newly developed technology platforms for real-time data insights for the purposes described in Section 74502, which may include student success initiatives or the detection, prevention, and mitigation of fraud.

(d) Empowering students, especially those taking courses across multiple community college campuses and multiple community college districts by offering seamless access to appropriate data, for purposes of supporting program completion and transfer pathways to the California State University and University of California systems. To the extent feasible, this support may also include support for associate degree for transfer pathways to independent institutions of higher education that offer associate degree for transfer opportunities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 13.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

74504.

(a) Funding appropriated for the development, implementation, and systemwide adoption of the Common Cloud Data Platform shall support, but not be limited to, all of the following areas of work:

(1) The development, integration, and expansion of a Common Cloud Data Platform for all community college districts that supports access and functionality for the purposes described in Section 74502, which may include enrollment management, student support, data access, dashboards, and future data system integrations.

(2) The incorporation of advanced analytics tools, real-time dashboards, technology-based student support and retention solutions, and fraud detection and mitigation
 solutions.

(3) Establishing and supporting consistent data quality assurance and governance processes to be used for the data integrated into the Common Cloud Data Platform.

(4) Establishing common data quality assurance practices and functionality that streamlines the development and submission of data files and attendance accounting reports to the chancellor’s office.

(b) The chancellor’s office may allocate up to 2 percent of the total amount appropriated for purposes of the Common Cloud Data Platform for state administrative operations to carry out the intent of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 13.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

74505.

(a) The chancellor’s office shall submit an interim status report on or before March 31, 2027, and a final status report on or before January 31, 2029, to the Department of Finance and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, detailing the progress of the Common Cloud Data Platform. The reports shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) The Common Cloud Data Platform’s implementation status and milestones achieved.

(2) The Common Cloud Data Platform’s underlying impact on student outcomes and systemwide efficiencies.

(3) The budget and expenditures of
 resources appropriated to support the Common Cloud Data Platform.

(4) Any challenges encountered, and solutions implemented, during the development of the Common Cloud Data Platform.

(b) The reports submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 13.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 46.5. California Online Community College Act [75000. - 75013.]

75000.

(a) This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Online Community College Act.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) According to the United States Census Bureau, 2011–15 American Community Survey data, there are 2.5 million Californians between 25 and 34 years of age whose highest educational attainment is either high school or some college. Of this group, 80 percent are working, and nearly half are Hispanic. The public segments of higher education have traditionally not offered courses that are readily accessible to these Californians. Working adults should have access to high-quality, affordable, and flexible opportunities to pursue
 postsecondary education that does not conflict with their work and familial obligations.

(2) California recognizes the dedication of every faculty member, classified staff member, manager, and administrator in the Community College system toward supporting the success of California’s community college students. As dedicated leaders, innovators, and educators, faculty will be integral to the success of the California Online Community College and improving the economic prosperity of numerous Californians.

(3) Flexible educational options are also critical to those displaced by job loss triggered by recessions. Californians have generally had a difficult time recovering from the Great Recession, but those with an associate’s degree earned higher wages and fared better in the recovery than those with only a high school degree or some college. Labor force participation remains low
 among the working age population, and economists believe this is partially due to a skills mismatch. Furthermore, according to the Economic Policy Institute, 60 percent of jobs created during the economic recovery from 2010 to 2014 went to men versus 40 percent of jobs that went to women.

(4) Immigrants, military veterans, and incarcerated or formerly incarcerated individuals could also benefit from the flexibility created by an affordable, high-quality online education that would allow them to improve their skills and advance their employment opportunities or stay relevant in their careers.

(5) Online education is showing a trend of improving course success rates over time. Research indicates the importance of institutional factors, such as course design, institutional support, effective student orientation and support services, and the development of strategies to promote
 regular interaction, in contributing to online course success. Studies also indicate that older students generally perform better in online courses than younger students.

(6) The cost for Californians to access online credentials, certificates, and associate’s degrees at nonpublic or out-of-state institutions is typically much higher—as much as seven to nine times higher per unit—than at a California community college. An affordable, high-quality, and flexible public online college provides an important alternative to other nonpublic online education options.

(7) According to the Public Utilities Commission, approximately 95 percent of California households have wired broadband availability. Recent legislation authorized additional funding for broadband and establishment of regional goals intended to reduce urban-rural disparities in broadband access. Additionally, the budget
 provides funding for public libraries to expand access to broadband.

(8) To ensure the future economic resiliency of California’s communities, the existing higher education infrastructure must be augmented with learning options that are focused on working learners, including options that are affordable, designed to be flexible for the schedule of working adults, and competency-based to facilitate portability of employable skills. With an open access mission, the California Community Colleges are positioned to work with a diverse population to increase wages and improve economic and social mobility in a rapidly changing economy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 18.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

75001.

(a) (1) The California Online Community College is hereby established.

(2) The California Online Community College shall be under the administration of the board of governors.

(3) The California Online Community College shall fulfill the purposes of this part, which includes the creation of an organized system of accessible, flexible, and high-quality online content, courses, and programs focused on providing industry-valued credentials compatible with the vocational and educational needs of Californians who are not currently accessing higher education. These courses and programs shall lead to a pathway offered at a traditional community college.

(4) The college shall be considered a district and community college within the California Community Colleges system and the state’s public system of higher education.

(5) For purposes of Section 14 of Article IX and Sections 8 and 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, “community college districts” shall include the California Online Community College established pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) The college shall be guided by principles and procedures developed by the chancellor’s office and established by the board of governors. These guiding principles shall include all of the following:

(1) Offering working adults additional access to affordable, quality higher education opportunities with labor market value, especially industry-valued
 credentials based on competencies leading to employment, earnings gain, or upward mobility in the workplace, and not just courses leading to degrees and certificates.

(2) Providing working adults with the necessary conditions for success with flexible course scheduling, start and stop-off times, technology-enabled support communities to deepen engagement and foster social belonging, and short-term credentials as demonstrations of academic progress.

(3) Supporting student success by developing and implementing innovative teaching and student support methodologies and technologies, including leveraging student data to improve teaching and learning and to support individual student progression, providing quality onboarding of students to support their career exploration, goal-setting, educational planning, and support needs, and leveraging relevant technology resources where
 possible.

(4) Enhancing systemwide student success efforts by using the college’s innovative teaching and student support methodologies and technologies to inform professional development opportunities available to the rest of the community college system.

(5) Ensuring faculty roles are based on the skills needs of the college, such as online instructors, course developers, assessment developers, student mentors, reviewers, and 24-hour virtual classroom support, and ensuring flexible hiring processes that emphasize use of part-time and full-time faculty with field expertise to support emerging programs and shifts in labor market demand.

(6) Addressing barriers faced by working adult students to access higher education, including, but not necessarily limited to, financial aid support, dealing with working learners’
 prior educational debts that may impede release of transcripts and credits, pathway navigational help, contextualized academic preparation, navigation of family needs and other supports, and coaching and mentoring.

(7) Aligning the college’s efforts with the broader goals outlined in the California Community Colleges system’s Vision for Success, or other strategic visions outlined by the board of governors, and holding the college accountable for its students’ outcomes and ensuring improved data collection on employment outcomes.

(8) Offering working adults additional access to affordable, high-quality higher education opportunities with labor market value that lead to additional educational opportunities provided by either the California Online Community College or by another California community college.

(c) The
 college may collaborate and work closely with other agencies, industry partners, and experts to ensure the success of the college, including, but not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(1) Students the college serves, to ensure the college meets their needs.

(2) Community-based organizations, to provide student outreach to working learners across California.

(3) Statewide public agencies, such as the State Department of Social Services, the California Labor and Workforce Development Agency, and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, to incorporate strategies to provide immigrants and other groups with barriers to employment with educational opportunities.

(4) Representatives from the labor community, to provide higher wage jobs for
 journey-level workers or augment apprenticeship training.

(5) Industry and employer partners, including statewide public agency employers, state associations, large employers, and regional consortia of employers, to inform content that is driven by the demands of the labor market and relevant to regional workforce needs.

(6) The California Community Colleges, to leverage their existing career technical education regional consortia, the Strong Workforce Program regional consortia, and adult education regional consortia.

(7) Two-year and four-year institutions or a consortia, to promote recognition of student skills and knowledge toward degree pathways as well as a way to increase student access and transfers to additional higher educational opportunities.

(d) The college shall conduct all of the following activities:

(1) The college shall offer at least three program pathways within the first three years of program implementation, developed exclusively to serve the population of students not yet accessing postsecondary education or without their first industry-valued credential. The college shall create new programs that are not duplicative of programs offered at other local community colleges.

(2) To ensure student success, the college shall also do all of the following:

(A) Establish competency-based educational opportunities that recognize students’ prior learning and help students advance toward a credential. Competencies shall be established with the advice of appropriate faculty and employers, and shall be focused on knowledge and skills a student
 must demonstrate to pass a course and to earn a credential. Examples of prior learning include prior military service, registered apprenticeship training, industry-recognized certifications, or experience from other careers. Assessments shall be developed to enable students to demonstrate mastery and shall be mapped to the competencies.

(B) Supplement registered apprenticeship programs and the California Apprenticeship Initiative training as appropriate, and create apprenticeship instructor upskilling training, courses, and programs that are valued by the labor and employer communities.

(C) Identify opportunities to develop short-term, stackable credentials and industry certifications with labor market value. The college shall also leverage existing articulation agreements and develop new articulation agreements with other California Community Colleges, the California State
 University, the University of California, and other accredited public and independent institutions to facilitate stackability into credit-bearing courses and pathways.

(D) Develop, adapt, or apply technology to meet the ongoing needs of students.

(E) Develop a Research and Development Unit that utilizes current and future learning sciences technology, assesses data metrics within the college’s technological infrastructure to gauge student progress in a course or pathway, informs instructional and support strategies, and improves the functionality of the underlying technology used by the college.

(F) Redesign transcripts in a digital, verifiable format that links coursework, credentials, and competencies to track a student’s entire body of learning in one document. Any redesigned transcript technology shall be a part
 of the integrated technology portfolio of the chancellor’s office and made available to any campus of the California Community Colleges.

(G) Identify shortcomings in the student experience for unserved and underserved students and develop technological and programmatic solutions to address the gap.

(H) Distribute gains in data and learning science and effective technology-enabled tools and resources throughout the California Community Colleges.

(3) The college shall utilize and leverage, where appropriate, the programs and activities of the chancellor’s office, including the Online Education Initiative and the Zero-Textbook-Cost Degree Grant Program and Open Educational Resources, the Strong Workforce Program, and the Guided Pathways Program framework. This shall include both of the following activities and
 practices:

(A) Organize newly developed content, courses, programs, and students supports, consistent with the Guided Pathways Program framework, that lead to a pathway at a traditional community college.

(B) Utilize the Online Education Initiative’s existing social and technological infrastructure for students, instructors, and administrators, including all of the following:

(i) Contribute to the Initiative’s common course management platform for online content and classes.

(ii) Utilize and develop comprehensive, specialized student supports that are technology-enabled for scale and focused on the student experience, including, but not limited to, pathway navigation, online tutoring, online mentoring, and online help desk support. These supports, as
 well as the instructional delivery, shall be made available during nontraditional working hours to promote student success for the focus population.

(iii) Leverage free or low-cost, high-quality online educational materials for students through Open Educational Resources and the Zero-Textbook-Cost Degree Grant. The college shall ensure any open educational resources that are developed are available for use by any California community college through the system’s common learning management platform.

(iv) Enhance systemwide student success efforts by using the college’s innovative teaching and student support methodologies and technologies to inform professional development opportunities available to the rest of the system through the Online Education Initiative and the Institutional Effectiveness Partnership Initiative.

(e) The college shall not enter into College and Career Access Pathways partnerships pursuant to Section 76004.

(f) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California Online Community College create unique content and deliver it in a manner that is not duplicative of programs offered at other local community colleges.

(2) For each new program created, the chancellor’s office shall notify the Legislature and Department of Finance on how the program is not duplicative of programs offered at other community colleges.

(g) Upon the establishment of an Academic Senate for the California Online Community College, the faculty shall review the Online Education Initiative Protocols for online content and adopt as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 85.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

75002.

For purposes of this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Artificial intelligence” has the same definition as in Section 11546.45.5 of the Government Code. 

(b) “Board of governors” means the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(c) “Chancellor’s office” means the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(d) “College” means the California Online Community College established under this part.

(e) “Competency-based education” means systems of instruction, assessment,
 grading, and academic reporting that are based on students demonstrating that they have learned the knowledge and skills they are expected to learn as they progress through their education.

(f) “Guided Pathways Program” means a program that includes the activities and practices established pursuant to Section 88921.

(g) “Industry” means trade associations or those firms that produce similar products or provide similar services using somewhat similar business processes.
